Maryland, session 2026, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–111.5.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT ENACTING THESE STANDARDS
ON THE HISTORY OF PALESTINE IS FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(1) ADDRESSING ANTI–PALESTINIAN HATE AND DISCRIMINATION
THROUGH EDUCATION AND PREVENTION;
(2) ENSURING STUDENTS RECEIVE ACCURATE, BALANCED, AND
HISTORICALLY GROUNDED INSTRUCTION REGARDING PALESTINIAN CULTURE,
HISTORY, AND IDENTITY;
(3) PROMOTING STUDENT SAFETY, INCLUSION, AND DIGNITY; AND
(4) STRENGTHENING EXISTING DIVERSITY, EQUITY, INCLUSION, AND
ANTIDISCRIMINATION FRAMEWORKS IN THE STATE’S PUBLIC SCHOOLS.

HOUSE BILL 1202 3
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE STATE BOARD SHALL
DEVELOP CONTENT STANDARDS REGARDING THE CULTURE AND HISTORY OF
PALESTINE TO BE INCLUDED IN THE STATE STANDARDS AND FRAMEWORKS IN
SOCIAL STUDIES.
(2) THE CONTENT STANDARDS FOR PALESTINIAN CULTURE AND
HISTORY SHALL INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(I) THE HISTORICAL PRESENCE OF PALESTINIANS IN THE
REGION OF PALESTINE;
(II) PALESTINIAN CULTURAL, RELIGIOUS, LINGUISTIC, AND
SOCIAL TRADITIONS;
(III) THE IMPACT OF DISPLACEMENT, STATELESSNESS, AND
CONFLICT ON PALESTINIANS, PARTICULARLY THE CIVILIAN POPULATION;
(IV) DISTINCTIONS BETWEEN GOVERNMENTS, POLITICAL
MOVEMENTS, AND CIVILIAN POPULATIONS;
(V) PRINCIPLES OF INTERNATIONAL HUMAN RIGHTS FOR
CIVILIAN POPULATIONS; AND
(VI) RECOGNITION OF PALESTINIAN IDENTITY AS A DISTINCT
ETHNIC AND CULTURAL IDENTITY.
(3) THE CONTENT STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) BE FACTUAL, HISTORICALLY GROUNDED, AND
NONPARTISAN;
(II) EMPHASIZE CRITICAL THINKING, MEDIA LITERACY, AND
RESPECTFUL DIALOGUE;
(III) AVOID POLITICAL ADVOCACY OR ENDORSEMENT OF A
PARTICULAR GOVERNMENT OR POLITICAL MOVEMENT; AND
(IV) RESPECT ACADEMIC FREEDOM AND THE ASSOCIATED
CONSTITUTIONAL PROTECTIONS AFFORDED TO TEACHERS AND STUDENTS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH TEACHERS, HISTORIANS,
CIVIL RIGHTS ORGANIZATIONS, AND COMMUNITY STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL DEVELOP:

HOUSE BILL 1202
(1) MODEL CURRICULUM GUIDES AND INSTRUCTIONAL RESOURCES
REGARDING THE CULTURE AND HISTORY OF PALESTINE IN ALIGNMENT WITH THE
CONTENT STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) OPTIONAL PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT RESOURCES FOR
TEACHERS ON CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE INSTRUCTION AND TEACHING SENSITIVE
HISTORICAL TOPICS.
(D) EACH COUNTY BOARD, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM, SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT AGE– AND
DEVELOPMENTALLY APPROPRIATE CURRICULUM GUIDES REGARDING THE
CULTURE AND HISTORY OF PALESTINE ALIGNED WITH THE CONTENT STANDARDS
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL IN
THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE PALESTINIAN CULTURE AND HISTORY IN THE SOCIAL
STUDIES CURRICULUM.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE POLITICAL ADVOCACY OR IDEOLOGICAL INSTRUCTION
FAVORABLE TO PALESTINE;
(2) LIMIT DISCUSSION OF MULTIPLE HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVES;
(3) SUPERSEDE EXISTING CONTENT STANDARDS, UNLESS THERE IS
AN IRRECONCILABLE CONFLICT; OR
(4) INFRINGE ON THE CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS OF TEACHERS OR
STUDENTS.
7–424.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Bullying, harassment, or intimidation” means intentional conduct,
including verbal, physical, or written conduct, or an intentional electronic communication,
that:
(i) Creates a hostile educational environment by substantially
interfering with a student’s educational benefits, opportunities, or performance, or with a
student’s physical or psychological well–being and is:

HOUSE BILL 1202 5
1. Motivated by an actual or a perceived personal
characteristic including race, national origin, marital status, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, religion, ancestry, physical attributes, socioeconomic status, familial
status, or physical or mental ability or disability;
2. Sexual in nature, including descriptions or depictions of a
student with the student’s intimate parts exposed or while engaged in an act of sexual
contact; or
3. Threatening or seriously intimidating; and
(ii) 1. Occurs on school property, at a school activity or event, or
on a school bus; or
2. Substantially disrupts the orderly operation of a school.
7–424.1.
(a) In this section, “bullying, harassment, or intimidation” has the meaning
stated in § 7–424 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) [By March 31, 2009, the] THE State Board, after consultation with and
input from local school systems, shall develop a model policy prohibiting bullying,
harassment, or intimidation in schools.
(2) The model policy developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) A statement prohibiting bullying, harassment, and intimidation
in schools;
(ii) A statement prohibiting reprisal or retaliation against
individuals who report acts of bullying, harassment, or intimidation;
(iii) A definition of bullying, harassment, or intimidation that is
either the same as set forth in subsection (a) of this section or a definition that is not less
inclusive than that definition;
(IV) A DEFINITION OF BULLYING, HARASSMENT, OR
INTIMIDATION THAT EXPRESSLY INCLUDES CONDUCT MOTIVATED BY AN
ANTI–PALESTINIAN BIAS;
[(iv)] (V) Standard consequences and remedial actions for persons
committing acts of bullying, harassment, or intimidation and for persons engaged in
reprisal or retaliation;

HOUSE BILL 1202
[(v)] (VI) Standard consequences and remedial actions for persons
found to have made false accusations;
[(vi)] (VII) Model procedures for reporting acts of bullying,
harassment, and intimidation;
[(vii)] (VIII) Model procedures for providing notice of an act of bullying,
harassment, or intimidation to:
1. A parent or guardian of the alleged victim, within 3
business days after the date the act is reported; and
2. A parent or guardian of the alleged perpetrator, within 5
business days after the date the act is reported;
[(viii)] (IX) Model procedures for the prompt investigation of acts of
bullying, harassment, and intimidation;
[(ix)] (X) Information about the types of support services available
to the student bully, victim, and any bystanders;
[(x)] (XI) Information regarding the availability and use of the
bullying, harassment, or intimidation form under § 7–424 of this subtitle; and
[(xi)] (XII) Information regarding the availability and use of an
anonymous two–way electronic tip program established under § 7–424 of this subtitle.
(3) By September 1, 2016, and every 5 years thereafter, the State Board,
after consultation with local school systems, shall update the model policy required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) (1) Each county board shall establish a policy prohibiting bullying,
harassment, or intimidation at school based on the model policy.
(2) The policy shall address the components of the model policy specified in
subsection (b)(2) of this section.
(3) A county board shall develop the policy in consultation with
representatives of the following groups:
(i) Parents or guardians of students;
(ii) School employees and administrators;
(iii) School volunteers;

HOUSE BILL 1202 7
(iv) Students; and
(v) Members of the community.
(4) By January 1, 2017, and every 5 years thereafter, each county board
shall update its policy based on the State Board’s update of the model policy under
subsection (b)(3) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Department of Education shall review the State Standards and
Frameworks in Social Studies of the Maryland College and Career Readiness Standards to
determine the appropriate placement for instruction on the culture and history of Palestine.
(b) On or before December 1, 2027, the State Department of Education shall
report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) the review conducted under subsection (a) of this section;
(2) the status of the Department’s development of the content standards
required under § 4–111.5 of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(3) summarize the plans that local school systems have regarding
implementation of the culture and history of Palestine curriculum aligned with the revised
social studies content standards;
(4) plans for curriculum resources;
(5) plans for teacher professional development resources; and
(6) any recommendations for improving cultural literacy or bias
prevention.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.